Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3124
Provisional license; title; duties.

A psychologist practicing with a provisional license shall use the title Provisionally Licensed Psychologist. A provisionally licensed psychologist shall disclose supervisory relationships to clients or patients for whom supervision is required and to third parties when relevant. A provisionally licensed psychologist shall not supervise other mental health professionals or independently evaluate persons under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act.

Laws 1999, LB 366, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 34;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,206.34;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1058.

Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act, see section 71-901.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.